Utah statutes.
19-6-1006.   Penalties.

A manufacturer who fails to submit, modify, or implement a plan according to this part and rules enacted under this part is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 per day per violation as determined in an administrative proceeding conducted according to the board's rules.



Enacted by Chapter 187, 2006 General Session

